Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Chapter 06. Uniform Partnership Act.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 10, ch. 115, SLA 2000 reads as follows: “APPLICABILITY. (a) Before January 1, 2004, secs. 1 — 7 of this Act do not apply to a partnership or limited liability partnership unless the partnership or limited liability partnership is formed

“(1) on or after January 1, 2001, but this paragraph does not apply to a partnership or limited liability partnership that is continuing the business of a partnership or limited liability partnership dissolved under AS 32.05; or

“(2) before January 1, 2001, and the partnership or limited liability partnership elects, under (c) of this section, to be governed by secs. 1 — 7 of this Act.

“(b) On and after January 1, 2004, secs. 1 — 7 of this Act apply to all partnerships and limited liability partnerships.

“(c) On or after January 1, 2001, and before January 1, 2004, partnerships and limited liability partnerships may voluntarily elect, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by secs. 1 — 7 of this Act. The provisions of secs. 1 — 7 of this Act relating to the liability of those partnership’s partners to third parties do not apply to limit the partners’ liability to a third party who does business with the partnership within one year preceding the partnership’s election to be governed by secs. 1 — 7 of this Act unless the third party knows or has received a notification of the partnership’s election to be governed by secs. 1 — 7 of this Act; the one-year period may not extend back to before January 1, 2001.

“(d) If, under (a) of this section, secs. 1 — 7 of this Act do not apply to a partnership or limited partnership, AS

04.21.035

and

04.21.080

, as those sections existed before being amended by this Act, AS

09.40.240

, as the section existed before being amended by this Act, AS

10.35.040

, as the section existed before being amended by this Act, AS 32.05, and AS

32.11.890

, as the section existed before being amended by this Act, apply to the partnership or limited partnership.

“(e) In this section, ‘limited liability partnership’ and ‘partnership’ have the meanings given in AS

32.06.995

, enacted by sec. 6 of this Act.”

Section 11, ch. 115, SLA 2000 reads as follows: “SAVINGS CLAUSE. Sections 1 — 9 of this Act do not affect an action or proceeding begun or a right accrued before January 1, 2001.”

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, §§ 24—27.

68 C.J.S., Partnership, § 11 et seq.